Hawaii statutes.
[§291E-61.6] Petition for ignition
interlock instruction permit and ignition interlock permit; eligibility;
requirements. (a) This section shall apply to the following:

(1) Any person subject to a lifetime license
revocation pursuant to part III, as that part was in effect before January 1,
2011, or part XIV of chapter 286, as that part was in effect before January 1,
2002;

(2) Any person who was arrested pursuant to section
291E-61 or 291E-61.5 before January 1, 2011, and whose license revocation period
has not terminated;

(3) Except as provided in section 286-118.5, any
person whose license was expired, had a learner's permit or instruction permit,
or who was otherwise unlicensed at the time of arrest pursuant to section
291E-61 or 291E-61.5; and

(4) Any person arrested pursuant to section 291E-61
or 291E-61.5 whose driver's license from another state is expired or will
expire during the license revocation period and who applies for a permit under
this section.

(b) Any person under subsection (a) may file a
petition in the district court for permission to apply for an ignition
interlock instruction permit that will allow the person to take the driving
demonstration portion of the driver's license examination. The petition shall
be filed with the clerk of the district court in the district in which the
arrest occurred and shall be accompanied by the required filing fee for civil
actions. The petition shall include the following:

(1) A certified court abstract establishing that
other than the instant offense, the petitioner has no pending traffic matters,
outstanding fines, outstanding court costs, and outstanding restitution;

(2) A certified statement from the director
establishing that the petitioner has complied with all requirements, including payment
of applicable fees, undergone substance abuse assessment and treatment, and
surrendered motor vehicle registration and vehicle number plates, if
applicable; and

(3) A proposed order.

In determining whether the petitioner may be granted
an ignition interlock instruction permit, the district court shall consider
whether the requirements of paragraphs (1) through (3) are met and may also
consider any other factors, including but not limited to the petitioner's
criminal and traffic record after receiving a lifetime license revocation, and
based on the foregoing, the district court shall determine whether an order
allowing the petitioner to apply to the director for an ignition interlock
instruction permit and requiring the director to remove any stopper placed on
the petitioner's motor vehicle registration files pursuant to part III
of chapter 291E, as applicable, shall be issued; provided that the petitioner
complies with applicable driver licensing requirements under part VI of chapter
286, and proof of financial responsibility under chapter 287. Upon submission
of the order to the director, the director shall remove any stopper placed on
the person's motor vehicle registration files and issue a certified statement
indicating eligibility for an ignition interlock instruction permit.

(c) To apply for an ignition interlock
instruction permit, the person shall:

(1) Present the certified statement of eligibility
for ignition interlock instruction permit, as provided in subsection (b), to
the examiner of drivers;

(2) Pass the written portion of the driver's license
examination in accordance with section 286-108;

(3) Install an ignition interlock device on a vehicle
to be used for the driving demonstration portion of the driver's license
examination; and

(4) Submit to the director the following:

(A) Proof of passing the written portion of
the driver's license examination;

(B) Proof of installation of the ignition
interlock device;

(C) Proof of motor vehicle insurance; and

(D) Proof of a valid motor vehicle
registration.

Upon receipt of proof of the requirements of
paragraph (4), the director shall issue an ignition interlock instruction
permit that allows the person to drive a category 1, 2, or 3 vehicle under
section 286-102(b) that is equipped with an ignition interlock device for the
period as provided in section 286-110; provided that a holder of the ignition
interlock instruction permit for a category 3 vehicle shall be accompanied by a
person who is twenty-one years of age or older and licensed to operate a
category 3 vehicle. The licensed person shall occupy a passenger seat beside
the permit holder while the category 3 vehicle equipped with an ignition
interlock device is being operated. For the purposes of this section,
"examiner of drivers" shall have the same meaning as provided in
section 286-2.

(d) Upon showing the ignition interlock
instruction permit to the examiner of drivers, an applicant may take the
driving demonstration portion of the driver's license examination in accordance
with section 286-108. Upon successful completion of the driving demonstration
portion of the driver's license examination, an applicant may apply to the
director for an ignition interlock permit pursuant to section 291E-44.5. If
granted, the ignition interlock permit shall expire as provided in section
286-106 or upon the end of the revocation period, whichever occurs first.

(e) After a minimum period of five years from
the issuance of an ignition interlock permit under subsection (d), a person
subject to a lifetime license revocation for operating a motor vehicle while
under the influence of an intoxicant may file a petition in the district court
to reinstate the person's eligibility for license and privilege to operate a
vehicle without an ignition interlock device. The petition shall be filed with
the clerk of the district court in the district in which the arrest occurred
and shall be accompanied by the required filing fee for civil actions. A copy
of the petition shall be served on the prosecuting attorney in the county in
which the petition is filed. The petition shall include the following:

(1) A certified court abstract establishing that:

(A) The petitioner has no pending traffic
matters, outstanding fines, outstanding court costs, and outstanding
restitution; and

(B) The petitioner has not been convicted of
any violation of section 291E-66 during the five-year period immediately
preceding the petition;

(2) A certified statement from the director
establishing that the petitioner has complied with all requirements, including
payment of applicable fees, undergone substance abuse assessment and treatment,
and surrendered motor vehicle registration and vehicle number plates, if
applicable;

(3) A certified statement from the director of
transportation establishing that:

(A) The petitioner has had an ignition
interlock device installed in a vehicle without a cumulative break of more than
thirty days during the five years immediately preceding the petition; and

(B) The petitioner has not attempted to
operate a vehicle with .04 or more grams of alcohol per two hundred ten liters
of breath during the two years immediately preceding the petition;

(4) A certificate of service demonstrating the place,
time, and manner of service of the petition on the prosecuting attorney;

(5) A certified record from the Hawaii Criminal
Justice Information System that shows the petitioner's current criminal history
record;

(6) A statement from the petitioner establishing
where the petitioner has resided since the ignition interlock permit was
issued;

(7) A statement from the petitioner as to whether the
petitioner has undergone substance abuse assessment and treatment and the
outcome of this assessment and treatment; and

(8) A proposed order.

Within ten days of service of the petition, the
prosecuting attorney may submit a written request for a hearing on the
petition. The district court shall set a hearing and the prosecuting attorney
shall serve notice of the hearing upon the petitioner at the petitioner's address
shown on the petition and in accordance with the applicable court rules
pertaining to service of civil process. The prosecuting attorney shall appear
at the hearing on the petition and may offer evidence and argument in support
of or against the granting of the petition. If the requirements of paragraphs
(1) through (8) are met and it appears to the court that the petitioner no
longer poses a danger to other persons using streets or highways and is not
likely to operate a vehicle under the influence of an intoxicant, the district
court shall grant the petition and issue an order declaring the person eligible
for relicensing and reregistration, if applicable. In making its decision, the
court, in addition to any other evidence, may consider the petitioner's
ignition interlock program driving records and history. If the prosecuting
attorney fails to submit a timely request for a hearing, and the requirements
of paragraphs (1) through (8) are met, the district court shall grant the
petition and issue an order declaring the petitioner eligible for relicensing
and reregistration, if applicable. If the court denies the petition, the
person may file another petition under this subsection no sooner than one year
from the date of the court order.

(f) Nothing in this section shall be
interpreted to allow repeat intoxicated driving to be treated as a first time
offense for purposes of relicensing. [L 2012, c 327, §4]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next